District of Columbia statutes.
2-540

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Freedom of Information Act of 1976”.

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title II, § 210
as added Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 5, 51 DCR 881
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 10(b), 53 DCR 6794
D.C. Law 16-191 rewrote the section which had previously read as follows: “This subchapter may be cited as the ”Freedom of Information Act“.”